Washington statutes.
RCW 6.32.210

Proceedings in case of joint debtors.

When, in proceedings under this chapter, personal service of the summons in the action was not made on all of the defendants, a debt due to, or other personal property owned by, one or more of the defendants not summoned jointly with the defendants summoned, or with any of them, may be reached by proceedings under this chapter.

[ 1893 c 133 s 21; RRS s 633.]